galician.aff
flag *X:                # "CAT=v,T=inf" # deve ser posta nos verbos regulares

A R         >  -AR,O       # "P=1,N=s,T=p"    #andar->ando
A R         >  -R,S        # "P=2,N=s,T=p"    #andar->andas
A R         >  -AR,A       # "P=3,N=s,T=p"    #andar->anda
A R         >  -R,MOS      # "P=1,N=p,T=p"    #andar->andamos
A R         >  -R,DES      # "P=2,N=p,T=p"    #andar->andades
A R         >  -R,N        # "P=3,N=p,T=p"    #andar->andan

[^CGUZ] A R >  -AR,E       # "P=1_3,N=s,T=ps"  #andar->ande
C A R       >  -CAR,QUE    # "P=1_3,N=s,T=ps"  #ficar->fique
G A R       >  -AR,UE      # "P=1_3,N=s,T=ps"  #xogar->xogue
[^G] U A R  >  -AR,E       # "P=1_3,N=s,T=ps"  #suar->sue
G U A R     >  -UAR,ÜE     # "P=1_3,N=s,T=ps"  #minguar->mingüe
Z A R       >  -ZAR,CE     # "P=1_3,N=s,T=ps"  #utilizar->utilice
[^CGUZ] A R >  -AR,ES      # "P=2,N=s,T=ps"    #andar->andes
C A R       >  -CAR,QUES   # "P=2,N=s,T=ps"    #ficar->fiques
G A R       >  -AR,UES     # "P=2,N=s,T=ps"    #xogar->xogues
[^G] U A R  >  -AR,ES      # "P=2,N=s,T=ps"    #suar->sues
G U A R     >  -UAR,ÜES    # "P=2,N=s,T=ps"    #minguar->mingües
Z A R       >  -ZAR,CES    # "P=2,N=s,T=ps"    #utilizar->utilices
[^CGUZ] A R >  -AR,EMOS    # "P=1,N=p,T=ps"	  #andar->andemos
C A R       >  -CAR,QUEMOS # "P=1,N=p,T=ps"    #ficar->fiquemos
G A R       >  -AR,UEMOS   # "P=1,N=p,T=ps"    #xogar->xoguemos
[^G] U A R  >  -AR,EMOS    # "P=1,N=p,T=ps"    #suar->suemos
G U A R     >  -UAR,ÜEMOS  # "P=1,N=p,T=ps"    #minguar->mingüemos
Z A R       >  -ZAR,CEMOS  # "P=1,N=p,T=ps"    #utilizar->utilizemos
[^CGUZ] A R >  -AR,EDES    # "P=2,N=p,T=ps"	  #andar->andedes
C A R       >  -CAR,QUEDES # "P=2,N=p,T=ps"    #ficar->fiquedes
G A R       >  -AR,UEDES   # "P=2,N=p,T=ps"    #xogar->xoguedes
[^G] U A R  >  -AR,EDES    # "P=1,N=p,T=ps"    #suar->suedes
G U A R     >  -UAR,ÜEDES  # "P=1,N=p,T=ps"    #minguar->mingüedes
Z A R       >  -ZAR,CEDES  # "P=2,N=p,T=ps"    #utilizar->utilicedes
[^CGUZ] A R >  -AR,EN      # "P=3,N=p,T=ps"    #andar->anden
C A R       >  -CAR,QUEN   # "P=3,N=p,T=ps"    #ficar->fiquen
G A R       >  -AR,UEN     # "P=3,N=p,T=ps"	  #xogar->xoguen
[^G] U A R  >  -AR,EN      # "P=3,N=p,T=ps"    #suar->suen
G U A R     >  -UAR,ÜEN    # "P=3,N=p,T=ps"    #minguar->mingüen
Z A R       >  -ZAR,CEN    # "P=3,N=p,T=pc"    #utilizar->utilicen

[^CU] E R    >  -ER,O      # "P=1,N=s,T=p"     #viver->vivo
C E R        >  -CER,ZO    # "P=1,N=s,T=p"     #crecer->crezo
G U E R      >  -UER,O     # "P=1,N=s,T=p"     #erguer->ergo
[^O] E R     >  -R,S       # "P=2,N=s,T=p"     #viver->vives
O E R        >  -OER,ÓIS   # "P=2,N=s,T=p"     #roer->róis
[^O] E R     >  -ER,E      # "P=3,N=s,T=p"     #viver->vive
O E R        >  -OER,ÓI    # "P=3,N=s,T=p"     #roer->rói
E R          >  -R,MOS     # "P=1,N=p,T=p"     #viver->vivemos
E R          >  -R,DES     # "P=2,N=p,T=p"     #viver->vivedes
E R          >  -R,N       # "P=3,N=p,T=p"     #viver->viven

[^CU] E R   >  -ER,A       # "P=1_3,N=s,T=ps"  #viver->viva
C E R       >  -CER,ZA     # "P=1_3,N=s,T=ps"  #crecer->creza
G U E R     >  -UER,A      # "P=1_3,N=s,T=ps"  #erguer->erga
[^CU] E R   >  -ER,AS      # "P=2,N=s,T=ps"    #viver->vivas
C E R       >  -CER,ZAS    # "P=2,N=s,T=ps"    #crecer->crezas
G U E R     >  -UER,AS     # "P=2,N=s,T=ps"    #erguer->ergas
[^CU] E R   >  -ER,AMOS    # "P=1,N=p,T=ps"    #viver->vivamos
C E R       >  -CER,ZAMOS  # "P=1,N=p,T=ps"    #crecer->crezamos
G U E R     >  -UER,AMOS   # "P=1,N=p,T=ps"    #erguer->ergamos
[^CU] E R   >  -ER,ADES    # "P=2,N=p,T=ps"    #viver->vivades
C E R       >  -CER,ZADES  # "P=2,N=p,T=ps"    #crecer->crezades 
G U E R     >  -UER,ADES   # "P=2,N=p,T=ps"    #erguer->ergades
[^CU] E R   >  -ER,AN      # "P=3,N=p,T=ps"    #viver->vivan
C E R       >  -CER,ZAN    # "P=3,N=p,T=ps"    #crecer->crezan
G U E R     >  -UER,AN     # "P=3,N=p,T=ps"    #erguer->ergan

[^ACUÜ] I R  >  -IR,O      # "P=1,N=s,T=p"     #partir->parto
A I R        >  -R,O       # "P=1,N=s,T=p"     #cair->caio
C I R        >  -CIR,ZO    # "P=1,N=s,T=p"     #producir->produzo
Ü I R        >  -ÜIR,UO    # "P=1,N=s,T=p"     #argüir->arguo
[^G] U I R   >  -IR,O      # "P=1,N=s,T=p"     #posuir->posuo
G U I R      >  -UIR,O     # "P=1,N=s,T=p"     #distinguir->distingo
[^AÜU] I R   >  -IR,ES     # "P=2,N=s,T=p"     #partir->partes
[AÜ] I R     >  -R,S       # "P=2,N=s,T=p"     #cair->cais
[^G] U I R   >  -R,S       # "P=2,N=s,T=p"     #posuir->posuis
G U I R      >  -IR,ES     # "P=2,N=s,T=p"     #distinguir->distingues
[^AÜU] I R   >  -IR,E      # "P=3,N=s,T=p"     #partir->parte
[AÜ] I R     >  -R,-       # "P=3,N=s,T=p"     #cair->cai
[^G] U I R   >  -R,-       # "P=3,N=s,T=p"     #posuir->posui
G U I R      >  -IR,E      # "P=3,N=s,T=p"     #distinguir->distingue
[^AUÜ] I R   >  -R,MOS     # "P=1,N=p,T=p"     #partir->partimos
[AÜ] I R     >  -IR,ÍMOS   # "P=1,N=p,T=p"     #cair->caímos
[^G] U I R   >  -IR,ÍMOS   # "P=1,N=p,T=p"     #posuir->posuímos
G U I R      >  -R,MOS     # "P=1,N=p,T=p"     #distinguir->distingimos
[^AUÜ] I R   >  -R,DES     # "P=2,N=p,T=p"     #partir->partides
[AÜ] I R     >  -IR,ÍDES   # "P=2,N=p,T=p"     #cair->caídes
[^G] U I R   >  -IR,ÍDES   # "P=2,N=p,T=p"     #posuir->posuídes
G U I R      >  -R,DES     # "P=2,N=p,T=p"     #distinguir->distinguides
I R          >  -IR,EN     # "P=3,N=p,T=p"     #partir->parten

[^ACUÜ] I R  >  -IR,A      # "P=1_3,N=s,T=ps"  #partir->parta
A I R        >  -R,A	  # "P=1_3,N=s,T=ps"  #cair->caia
C I R        >  -CIR,ZA    # "P=1_3,N=s,T=ps"  #producir->produza
Ü I R        >  -ÜIR,UA    # "P=1_3,N=s,T=ps"  #argüir->argua
[^G] U I R   >  -IR,A      # "P=1_3,N=s,T=ps"  #posuir->posua
G U I R	   >  -UIR,A     # "P=1_3,N=s,T=ps"  #distinguir->distinga
[^ACUÜ] I R  >  -IR,AS     # "P=2,N=s,T=ps"    #partir->partas
A I R        >  -R,AS      # "P=2,N=s,T=ps"    #cair->caias
C I R        >  -CIR,ZAS   # "P=2,N=s,T=ps"    #producir->produzas
Ü I R        >  -ÜIR,UAS   # "P=2,N=s,T=ps"	  #argüir->arguas
[^G] U I R   >  -IR,AS     # "P=2,N=s,T=ps"	  #posuir->posuas
G U I R      >  -UIR,AS    # "P=2,N=s,T=ps"	  #distinguir->distingas

[^ACUÜ] I R  >  -IR,AMOS   # "P=1,N=p,T=ps"    #partir->partamos
A I R        >  -R,AMOS    # "P=1,N=p,T=ps"    #cair->caiamos
C I R        >  -CIR,ZAMOS # "P=1,N=p,T=ps"    #producir->produzamos
Ü I R        >  -ÜIR,UAMOS # "P=1,N=p,T=ps"    #argüir->arguamos
[^G] U I R   >  -IR,AMOS   # "P=1,N=p,T=ps"    #posuir->posuamos
G U I R      >  -UIR,AMOS  # "P=1,N=p,T=ps"    #distinguir->distingamos
[^ACUÜ] I R  >  -IR,ADES   # "P=2,N=p,T=ps"    #partir->partades
A I R        >  -R,ADES    # "P=2,N=p,T=ps"    #cair->caiades
C I R        >  -CIR,ZADES # "P=2,N=p,T=ps"    #producir->produzades
Ü I R        >  -ÜIR,UADES # "P=2,N=p,T=ps"    #argüir->arguades
[^G] U I R   >  -IR,ADES   # "P=2,N=p,T=ps"    #posuir->posuades
G U I R      >  -UIR,ADES  # "P=2,N=p,T=ps"    #distinguir->distingades
[^ACUÜ] I R  >  -IR,AN     # "P=3,N=p,T=ps"    #partir->partan
A I R        >  -R,AN      # "P=3,N=p,T=ps"    #cair->caian
C I R        >  -CIR,ZAN   # "P=3,N=p,T=ps"    #producir->produzan
Ü I R        >  -ÜIR,UAN   # "P=3,N=p,T=ps"    #argüir->arguan
[^G] U I R   >  -IR,AN     # "P=3,N=p,T=ps"    #posuir->posuan
G U I R      >  -UIR,AN    # "P=3,N=p,T=ps"    #distinguir->distingan

A R 		   > -AR,Á	  # amar->ama-(lo,la, etc.)
E R          > -ER,É	  # comer->come-(lo,la, etc.)

#---------------------------------------------
# Resto de tempos verbais dos verbos regulares e alguns semirregulares
